test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kuqzh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kuʼž: # Noun 89 'eng /est kusi/fin' - full paradigm
     kuʼž+N+Sg+Nom: [kuʼž, kuž]
     kuʼž+N+Sg+Gen: [kuʼz, kuz]
     kuʼž+N+Sg+Par: kuztā
     kuʼž+N+Sg+Dat: [kuʼzzõn, kuzzõn]
     kuʼž+N+Sg+Ins: [kuʼzkõks, kuzkõks]
     kuʼž+N+Sg+Ill: [kuʼzzõ, kuzzõ]
     kuʼž+N+Sg+Ela: [kuʼzzõst, kuzzõst]
     kuʼž+N+Pl+Nom: kuzūd
     kuʼž+N+Pl+Gen: kuzūd
     kuʼž+N+Pl+Par: [kuʼžži, kužži]
     kuʼž+N+Pl+Dat: kuzūdõn
     kuʼž+N+Pl+Ins: kuzūdõks
     kuʼž+N+Pl+Ill: kužīz
     kuʼž+N+Pl+Ela: kužīst
